old/toy.foma
define ClusterDevoicing k -> q || gh _ Alphabet* ∘
                        y -> s || _ [Stop | VoicelessFricative | VoicelessNasal] ∘
                        y -> s || [Stop | VoicelessFricative | VoicelessNasal] _ ∘
                        t [z | y] -> s                                           ∘ ! tz/ty cluster becomes s
						v -> f || Stop _                                         ∘
						v -> f || _ Stop                                         ∘
						t v -> f || C _                                          ∘
						v -> f || k _                                            ∘
						z -> s || Stop _                                         ;

define Undoubling ll -> l, rr -> r, gg -> g, ghh -> gh, ghhw -> ghw || _ [Stop | f | s | wh] ∘   
                  ll -> l, rr -> r, gg -> g, ghh -> gh, ghhw -> ghw || [Stop | f | s | wh | h] _ ∘   
		          mm -> m, nn -> n, ngng -> ng, ngngw -> ngw        || [Stop | f | s | wh | h] _ ∘
				  ll -> l, rr -> r, gg -> g, ghh -> gh, ghhw -> ghw || _ ll ∘ 
                  ll -> l, rr -> r, gg -> g, ghh -> gh, ghhw -> ghw || [ll| rr | gg | ghh |ghhw] _ ∘ 
                  mm -> m, nn -> n, ngng -> ng, ngngw -> ngw        || [ll| rr | gg | ghh |ghhw] _ ;

def BaseFinalEndings ghw      -> qw , 
                     gh ("*") -> q  , 
                     g        -> k  ,
                     w        -> kw ,
                     t e      -> t a  ||   _ (Enclitic) WordBoundary  , 
                     t e      -> n    || V _ (Enclitic) WordBoundary  ∘
					 e        -> a    ||   _ (Enclitic) WordBoundary  ∘
				     gh q     -> q    ||   _ (Enclitic) WordBoundary  ∘
					 t        -> n,
					 ll       -> l,
					 k        -> g    ||   WordBoundary Alphabet* _ "ng" u q  ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                        !!!
!!!      Rule Cascade      !!!
!!!                        !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

define Rules [
	Filters                        ∘
    Lexicon                        ∘
	Lowercase                      ∘
	MultipleForms                  ∘
	InsertMorphBoundary            ∘
	AlternativeForms               ∘
	!! ITERATION 1 !!
    JunctureGraphemeInsertion      ∘
	teDropping                     ∘
	NoHopNoDropE                   ∘
    SemiAndFinalE                  ∘
	SemiFinalE                     ∘
	FinalConsonantDropAssimilation ∘
	WeakFinalC                     ∘
	UnmarkStrongGh                 ∘
	InterConsonantalE              ∘
    UvularDropping                 ∘
	VelarUvularRounding            ∘
    FinalE                         ∘
	TripleVowelCluster             ∘
    VowelDominance                 ∘
	CleanupMorphBoundary           ∘
	!! ITERATION 2 !!
    JunctureGraphemeInsertion      ∘
	teDropping                     ∘
	NoHopNoDropE                   ∘
    SemiAndFinalE                  ∘
	SemiFinalE                     ∘
	FinalConsonantDropAssimilation ∘
	WeakFinalC                     ∘
	UnmarkStrongGh                 ∘
	InterConsonantalE              ∘
    UvularDropping                 ∘
	VelarUvularRounding            ∘
    FinalE                         ∘
	TripleVowelCluster             ∘
    VowelDominance                 ∘
	CleanupMorphBoundary           ∘
	!! ITERATION 3 !!
    JunctureGraphemeInsertion      ∘
	teDropping                     ∘
	NoHopNoDropE                   ∘
    SemiAndFinalE                  ∘
	SemiFinalE                     ∘
	FinalConsonantDropAssimilation ∘
	WeakFinalC                     ∘
	UnmarkStrongGh                 ∘
	InterConsonantalE              ∘
    UvularDropping                 ∘
	VelarUvularRounding            ∘
    FinalE                         ∘
	TripleVowelCluster             ∘
    VowelDominance                 ∘
	CleanupMorphBoundary           ∘
	!! ITERATION 4 !!
    JunctureGraphemeInsertion      ∘
	teDropping                     ∘
	NoHopNoDropE                   ∘
    SemiAndFinalE                  ∘
	SemiFinalE                     ∘
	FinalConsonantDropAssimilation ∘
	WeakFinalC                     ∘
	UnmarkStrongGh                 ∘
	InterConsonantalE              ∘
    UvularDropping                 ∘
	VelarUvularRounding            ∘
    FinalE                         ∘
	TripleVowelCluster             ∘
    VowelDominance                 ∘
	CleanupMorphBoundary           ∘
	!! ITERATION 5 !!
    JunctureGraphemeInsertion      ∘
	teDropping                     ∘
	NoHopNoDropE                   ∘
    SemiAndFinalE                  ∘
	SemiFinalE                     ∘
	FinalConsonantDropAssimilation ∘
	WeakFinalC                     ∘
	UnmarkStrongGh                 ∘
	InterConsonantalE              ∘
    UvularDropping                 ∘
	VelarUvularRounding            ∘
    FinalE                         ∘
	TripleVowelCluster             ∘
    VowelDominance                 ∘
	CleanupMorphBoundary           ∘
	!! ITERATION 6 !!
    JunctureGraphemeInsertion      ∘
	teDropping                     ∘
	NoHopNoDropE                   ∘
    SemiAndFinalE                  ∘
	SemiFinalE                     ∘
	FinalConsonantDropAssimilation ∘
	WeakFinalC                     ∘
	UnmarkStrongGh                 ∘
	InterConsonantalE              ∘
    UvularDropping                 ∘
	VelarUvularRounding            ∘
    FinalE                         ∘
	TripleVowelCluster             ∘
    VowelDominance                 ∘
	CleanupMorphBoundary           ∘
	!! ITERATION 7 !!
    JunctureGraphemeInsertion      ∘
	teDropping                     ∘
	NoHopNoDropE                   ∘
    SemiAndFinalE                  ∘
	SemiFinalE                     ∘
	FinalConsonantDropAssimilation ∘
	WeakFinalC                     ∘
	UnmarkStrongGh                 ∘
	InterConsonantalE              ∘
    UvularDropping                 ∘
	VelarUvularRounding            ∘
    FinalE                         ∘
	TripleVowelCluster             ∘
    VowelDominance                 ∘
	CleanupMorphBoundary           ∘
	ClusterDevoicing               ∘
	BaseFinalEndings               ∘
	Undoubling
] ;


define Grammar [ Rules ] ;
push Grammar
pairs
